Maryland, session 2026, SB0549.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
10–706.
(a) (1) Except as provided by paragraph (2) of this subsection, promptly after
admission of an individual, a facility shall make and periodically update a written plan of
treatment for the individual in the facility, in accordance with the provisions of this
subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0549*

SENATE BILL 549
(2) Promptly after admission of an individual to a psychosocial center, the
center shall make and periodically update a written plan of rehabilitation for the individual
in the facility, in accordance with the provisions of this subtitle.
(b) The Director shall adopt rules and regulations under this section that include:
(1) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, a description of the nature and
content of plans of treatment; and
(2) Subject to subsection (e) of this section, appropriate time periods for the
development, implementation, and review of each plan.
(c) An individual shall:
(1) Participate, in a manner appropriate to the individual’s condition, in
the development and periodic updating of the plan of treatment; and
(2) Be told, in appropriate terms and language, of:
(i) The content and objectives of the plan of treatment;
(ii) The nature and significant possible adverse effects of
recommended treatments;
(iii) The name, title, and role of personnel directly responsible for
carrying out the treatment for the individual; and
(iv) When appropriate, other available alternative treatments,
services, or providers of mental health services.
(d) A plan of treatment shall include:
(1) A long–range discharge goal; and
(2) An estimate of the probable length of inpatient stay the individual
requires before transfer to a less restrictive or intensive treatment setting.
(e) Facility staff who work directly with and provide treatment to an individual
shall review and reassess the plan of treatment for the individual to determine the
individual’s progress and any need for adjustments to the plan not less than:
(1) Once every 15 days for the first 2 months after admission of the
individual to the facility; and
(2) Once every 60 days for the remainder of the inpatient stay of the
individual in the facility.

SENATE BILL 549 3
(f) (1) On the admission of an individual to a facility, the facility shall:
(i) [Ask] INFORM THE INDIVIDUAL VERBALLY AND USING
PLAIN LANGUAGE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S RIGHTS AS A PATIENT TO HAVE A FAMILY
MEMBER OR OTHER AUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL BE INFORMED OF AND GIVEN THE
OPPORTUNITY TO PARTICIPATE IN MEETINGS WITH THE TREATMENT TEAM
REGARDING THE DEVELOPMENT, REVIEW, AND REASSESSMENT OF THE PLAN OF
TREATMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
(II) USING A SEPARATE, PLAIN–LANGUAGE FORM, ASK the
individual whether the individual consents to family members or any other individuals
being informed of and given the opportunity to participate in meetings with the treatment
team regarding the development, review, and reassessment of the plan of treatment of the
individual; [and]
(III) IF CONSENT IS GIVEN UNDER ITEM (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH,
PROVIDE THE INDIVIDUAL AND ANY FAMILY MEMBER OR OTHER INDIVIDUAL THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS AGREED TO ALLOW TO PARTICIPATE WITH A MODEL MENTAL
HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE FORM DEVELOPED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND
INFORMATION ON SUPPORTED DECISION–MAKING AGREEMENTS; AND
[(ii)] (IV) If consent is given under item [(i)] (II) of this paragraph, at
least every 7 days after consent is given, reconfirm the consent and provide the individual
at a clinical visit with an opportunity to consent to additional individuals being informed
of and given the opportunity to participate in meetings with the treatment team.
(2) If an individual agrees to have family members or other individuals
participate in the development, review, and reassessment of the individual’s plan of
treatment, the facility shall:
(i) Provide a schedule of routine treatment team meetings where
the plan of treatment is discussed;
(ii) Establish a process for the authorized individuals to participate
in treatment team meetings;
(iii) If the treatment team meeting is being held outside the regular
schedule, inform the authorized individuals as soon as the meeting is scheduled; and
(iv) If the treatment team meeting is being held due to an emergency,
inform the authorized individuals of the outcome of the meeting as soon as practicable.
(3) The individual may withdraw the consent given under paragraph (1) of
this subsection at any time orally or in writing.

SENATE BILL 549
(4) A treating provider may withhold information on an individual plan of
treatment from a family member or other authorized individual if:
(i) In the treating provider’s clinical judgment, the consent given
under paragraph (1) of this subsection was provided through coercive means;
(ii) The treating provider [believes it is in the best clinical interest
of] MAKES A SPECIFIC, WRITTEN FINDING IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S PATIENT RECORD
THAT THE FAMILY MEMBER’S OR OTHER AUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL’S PRESENCE IS
CAUSING DEMONSTRABLE EMOTIONAL OR PHYSICAL HARM TO the individual; or
(iii) The individual requests that a specific piece of the plan of
treatment be withheld.
(5) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, IF
AN INDIVIDUAL HAS EXECUTED A MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE, DURABLE
POWER OF ATTORNEY FOR HEALTH CARE, OR A SUPPORTED DECISION–MAKING
AGREEMENT, A FACILITY SHALL RECOGNIZE THE MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE
DIRECTIVE, DURABLE POWER OF ATTORNEY FOR HEALTH CARE, OR SUPPORTED
DECISION–MAKING AGREEMENT AS AN INDIVIDUAL’S FORMAL REQUEST FOR A
FAMILY MEMBER OR OTHER AUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL TO PARTICIPATE IN THE
DEVELOPMENT, REVIEW, AND REASSESSMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S PLAN OF
TREATMENT.
(II) A TREATING PROVIDER MAY WITHHOLD INFORMATION ON
AN INDIVIDUAL PLAN OF TREATMENT FROM A FAMILY MEMBER OR OTHER
AUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL LISTED IN A MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE,
DURABLE POWER OF ATTORNEY FOR HEALTH CARE, OR SUPPORTED
DECISION–MAKING AGREEMENT ONLY IF:
1. THE TREATING PROVIDER CONDUCTS A FORMAL
CAPACITY ASSESSMENT OF THE INDIVIDUAL;
2. THE TREATING PROVIDER FINDS THAT THE
INDIVIDUAL HAS CAPACITY;
3. THE INDIVIDUAL EXPLICITLY AND FORMALLY
OBJECTS TO THE PARTICIPATION OF THE FAMILY MEMBER OR OTHER AUTHORIZED
INDIVIDUAL LISTED IN THE MENTAL HEALTH ADVANCE DIRECTIVE, DURABLE
POWER OF ATTORNEY FOR HEALTH CARE, OR SUPPORTED DECISION–MAKING
AGREEMENT; AND

SENATE BILL 549 5
4. THE FINDING OF CAPACITY AND THE INDIVIDUAL’S
OBJECTION TO THE PARTICIPATION OF THE FAMILY MEMBER OR OTHER
AUTHORIZED INDIVIDUAL IS NOTED IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S PATIENT RECORD.
(g) (1) If an individual admitted to a facility or any family member or other
individual authorized by the individual to participate in the review and reassessment of
the plan of treatment for the individual under subsection (f) of this section believes that the
plan of treatment is not meeting the needs of the individual, the individual, family member,
or other authorized individual has the right to request that the facility review and reassess
the plan of treatment.
(2) On receipt of a request under paragraph (1) of this subsection, the
facility staff who work directly with and provide treatment to the individual shall:
(i) Conduct a review and reassessment of the plan of treatment;
(ii) Communicate the results of the review and reassessment of the
plan of treatment to the patient and individual who requested the review and
reassessment, including an explanation of how all issues raised in the request were
considered; and
(iii) Include the request for the review and reassessment of the plan
of treatment and the outcome of the review and assessment, including the explanation of
the outcome, in the medical records of the individual.
(3) If a State facility does not make any changes to the plan of treatment
for the individual, the State facility shall provide referral information for the Resident
Grievance System established under COMAR 10.21.14.
(h) An individual admitted to a State facility or another individual authorized by
the admitted individual may request a reconsideration of the review and reassessment
completed under subsection (g) of this section by filing a grievance with the Resident
Grievance System under COMAR 10.21.14.
(i) (1) An individual admitted to a State facility or another individual
authorized by the admitted individual may appeal the reconsideration of the review and
reassessment completed under subsection (h) of this section by filing a request with the
Department’s Healthcare System’s Chief Medical Officer.
(2) The Department shall adopt regulations to establish a process for the
appeal of the reconsideration of the review and reassessment under paragraph (1) of this
subsection.
(j) If an individual is admitted to a State facility and the State facility is unable
to provide the treatment necessary to address the rehabilitation needs of an individual
under a plan of treatment for the individual, the State facility shall:

SENATE BILL 549
(1) Make arrangements for the individual to receive necessary treatment
from another facility or other health care provider outside the State facility; and
(2) Ensure that treatment for the individual is coordinated between the
State facility and the other facility or health care provider.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.